Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2349
Construction of generic terms to accord with relationships as defined for intestate succession.

Halfbloods, adopted individuals and individuals born out of wedlock are included in class gift terminology and terms of relationship in accordance with rules for determining relationships for purposes of intestate succession.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 71, UPC § 2-611.